Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 6 Conformity with Federal Law

47-1-80.
Distributions to conform to regulations issued under the Internal Revenue Code.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title to the contrary, distributions from any public retirement or pension system shall conform to a good-faith interpretation of Section 401(a)(9) of the federal Internal Revenue Code and the regulations promulgated pursuant to such section as applicable to a governmental plan within the meaning of Section 414(d) of the federal Internal Revenue Code and shall be implemented in accordance with the grandfathering provisions of such regulations applicable to annuity option distributions in effect on April 17, 2001.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-80

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 535, § 2/HB 460; Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 4/HB 202.

The 2009 amendment,

effective May 11, 2009, substituted “a good-faith interpretation of” for “the regulations issued under” and inserted “and the regulations promulgated pursuant to such section” in this Code section.

47-1-80.1.
Provisions applicable to all public retirement or pension systems; maximum annuity paid; limitation on death and disability benefits; application of federal provisions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title to the contrary, any public retirement or pension system shall be subject to the following provisions:

Benefits shall begin by the required beginning date, which is the later of April 1 of the calendar year following the calendar year in which the plan member reaches 70 1/2 years of age or April 1 of the calendar year in which the plan member terminates employment. If a plan member fails to apply for retirement benefits by the required beginning date, the applicable public retirement or pension system shall begin distribution of the benefit as required by Section 401(a)(9) of the federal Internal Revenue Code.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, for any plan member who was entitled to receive a benefit under the public retirement or pension as of December 31, 1996, and attained the age of 70 1/2 on or before December 31, 1998, the required beginning date shall be deemed to be April 1 following the calendar year in which the member attained the age of 70 1/2, regardless of whether the member was then employed by the employer;

A plan member’s entire interest shall be distributed over the plan member’s life or the lives of the plan member and a designated beneficiary or over a period not extending beyond the life expectancy of the plan member or the life expectancy of the plan member and his or her designated beneficiary;

The life expectancy of a plan member, the plan member’s spouse, or the plan member’s designated beneficiary shall not be recalculated after the initial determination for purposes of determining benefits;

If a plan member dies after the required distribution of benefits has begun, the remaining portion of the plan member’s interest shall be distributed at least as rapidly as under the method of distribution before the plan member’s death and no longer than the remaining period over which the distribution commenced; and

If a plan member dies before the required distribution of the plan member’s benefits has begun, the plan member’s entire interest shall be either distributed in accordance with federal regulations over the life or the life expectancy of the designated beneficiary, with the distributions beginning no later than December 31 of the calendar year immediately following the calendar year of the plan member’s death or distributed by December 31 of the calendar year containing the fifth anniversary of the plan member’s death.

The amount of an annuity paid to a plan member’s designated beneficiary shall not exceed the maximum determined under the incidental death benefit requirements of the federal Internal Revenue Code.

The death and disability benefits provided by the plan shall be limited by the incidental benefit rule set forth in Section 401(a)(9)(G) of the federal Internal Revenue Code and Federal Treasury Regulation Section 1.401-1(b)(l)(i) or any successor to such regulation.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of this Code section, a member or beneficiary who would have been required to receive required minimum distributions for 2009 but for the enactment of Section 401(a)(9)(H) of the federal Internal Revenue Code shall not receive those distributions for 2009 unless the member or beneficiary chooses to receive such distributions. Such members and beneficiaries shall be given the opportunity to elect to receive such distributions. In addition, notwithstanding the provisions of Code Section 47-1-81, and solely for purposes of applying the direct rollover provisions of the federal Internal Revenue Code, 2009 required minimum distributions shall be treated as eligible rollover distributions. This subsection shall also apply to required minimum distributions after 2009 if federal law is extended to include such later years.

A public retirement or pension system to which subsection (d) of this Code section applies may choose a default option to pay 2009 required minimum distributions unless otherwise elected by the member, provided that the individual system adopt such a default rule for its members only in its plan documents.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-80.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 5/HB 202; Ga. L. 2010, p. 427, § 2/HB 969.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 11, 2009.

The 2010 amendment,

effective May 24, 2010, added subsections (d) and (e).

U.S. Code.

Section 401 of the federal Internal Revenue Code, referred to in subsection (d), is codified at

26 U.S.C. § 401

.

47-1-81.
Election to have a portion of an eligible rollover distribution paid to an eligible retirement plan under federal law; limitations; application to nonspouse designated beneficiary.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Direct rollover” means a payment by the public retirement or pension system subject to this title to the eligible retirement plan specified by the distributee or to the surviving spouse of the distributee.

“Distributee” means:

An employee;

A former employee;

The employee or former employee’s surviving spouse; or

A nonspouse beneficiary who is a designated beneficiary as defined in Section 401(a)(9)(E) of the federal Internal Revenue Code.

“Eligible retirement plan” means any of the following that accepts the distributee’s eligible rollover distribution:

An individual retirement account described in Section 408(a) of the federal Internal Revenue Code;

An individual retirement annuity described in Section 408(b) of the federal Internal Revenue Code;

An annuity plan described in Section 403(a) of the federal Internal Revenue Code;

A qualified trust described in Section 401(a) of the federal Internal Revenue Code;

An annuity contract described in Section 403(b) of the federal Internal Revenue Code.

An eligible deferred compensation plan under Section 457(b) of the federal Internal Revenue Code that is maintained by a state, political subdivision or agency or instrumentality of a state, or a political subdivision of a state and which agrees to separately account for amounts transferred into that plan from the public retirement or pension system under this title; and

A Roth IRA described in Section 408A of the federal Internal Revenue Code.

“Eligible rollover distribution” means any distribution of all or any portion of the balance to the credit of the distributee; provided, however, such term shall not include:

Any distribution that is one of a series of substantially equal periodic payments made not less frequently than annually for the life or life expectancy of the distributee or the joint lives or joint life expectancies of the distributee and the distributee’s designated beneficiary or for a specified period of ten years or more;

Any distribution to the extent such distribution is required under Section 401(a)(9) of the federal Internal Revenue Code;

The portion of any distribution that is not includable in gross income; or

Any other distribution that is reasonably expected to total less than $200.00 during the year.

Such term shall include a distribution to a surviving spouse made on or after January 1, 2002.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this title to the contrary that would otherwise limit a person’s election under this Code section, a member of a retirement or pension system subject to this title may elect, at the time and in the manner prescribed by the board of trustees of such system, to have any portion of an eligible rollover distribution, as such term is defined in Section 402(c) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, paid directly to an eligible retirement plan, as such term is defined in Section 402(c) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, specified by the person in a direct rollover.

A portion of a distribution made on or after January 1, 2002, shall not fail to be an eligible rollover distribution merely because the portion consists of after-tax employee contributions that are not includable in gross income; provided, however, that such portion may be transferred only to:

An individual retirement account or annuity described in Section 408(a) or (b) of the federal Internal Revenue Code;

A qualified defined contribution plan described in Section 401(a) or 403(a) of the federal Internal Revenue Code;

A qualified defined benefit plan described in Section 401(a) of the federal Internal Revenue Code; or

An annuity contract described in Section 403(b) of the federal Internal Revenue Code which agrees to account separately for amounts so transferred, and earnings thereon, including accounting separately for the portion of such distribution that is includable in gross income and the portion that is not so includable.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title to the contrary, a nonspouse designated beneficiary may roll over the distribution only to an individual retirement account or individual retirement annuity established for the purpose of receiving the distribution, and the account or annuity shall be treated as an inherited individual retirement account or annuity.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-81

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 535, § 2/HB 460; Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 6/HB 202; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 64/SB 436.

The 2009 amendment,

effective May 11, 2009, added subsection (a), designated the existing provisions as subsection (b), and added subsections (c) and (d).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, deleted the comma following “beneficiary” in subparagraph (a)(4)(A) and substituted “Section” for “Sections” near the end of paragraph (c)(2).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 67, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “In the event of an irreconcilable conflict between a provision of Sections 62 through 64 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2010 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over this Act to the extent of the conflict.”

47-1-82.
Maximum annual additions and maximum benefit payable limited to that allowed by federal law.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this title to the contrary, the maximum annual additions and maximum benefit payable to any active or retired member or beneficiary of a public retirement or pension system subject to this title shall be limited to such extent as may be necessary to conform to the requirements of subsections (b) and (c) of Section 415 of the federal Internal Revenue Code for a qualified retirement plan.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-82

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 535, § 2/HB 460; Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 7/HB 202; Ga. L. 2010, p. 427, § 3/HB 969; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 64/SB 436; Ga. L. 2014, p. 223, § 1/HB 843.

The 2009 amendment,

effective May 11, 2009, added subsection (a), designated the existing provisions as subsection (b), and added subsections (c) through (e).

The 2010 amendments. —

The first 2010 amendment, effective May 24, 2010, substituted the present provisions of paragraph (a)(2) for the former provisions, which read: “ ‘Applicable mortality table’ means the table prescribed by the secretary of the treasury of the United States in Revenue Ruling 95-6 or any successor thereto which prescribes the mortality table to be applied pursuant to Section 415(b)(2)(E)(v) of the federal Internal Revenue Code. To the extent that a forfeiture does not occur upon death, the mortality decrement may be ignored prior to age 62 and shall be ignored after social security retirement age, as prescribed by federal Internal Revenue Service Notice 83-10, Q&A G-3 and G-4, or any successor thereto.”; in paragraph (a)(5), substituted “calendar” for “plan”, added a semicolon, and added the proviso; in subsection (b), inserted “maximum annual additions and the” near the beginning and inserted “subsections (b) and (c) of” near the end; and, in subsection (c), added “or” at the end of paragraph (c)(1), substituted a period for “; or” at the end of paragraph (c)(2), and deleted former paragraph (c)(3) which read: “The value of postretirement cost-of-living increases provided that the amount payable to the plan member under the nonannuity benefit form in any limitation year shall not be greater than the Section 415(b) of the federal Internal Revenue Code limit applicable at the annuity starting date as increased in subsequent years pursuant to Section 415(d) of the federal Internal Revenue Code and Section 1.415(d)-1 of the Treasury Regulations.” The second 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, substituted “increases, provided” for “increases provided” in paragraph (c)(3).

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, rewrote this Code section.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 67, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “In the event of an irreconcilable conflict between a provision of Sections 62 through 64 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2010 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over this Act to the extent of the conflict.” Accordingly, the amendment to paragraph (c)(3) of this Code section by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 64 was not given effect.

47-1-83.
Vesting of member’s accrued benefit as of date of termination or partial termination of public retirement or pension system.

In accordance with subsection (a) of the federal Treasury Regulation Section 1.401-6, in the event of a termination or partial termination of a public retirement or pension system, a member’s accrued benefit as of the date of such termination or partial termination, to the extent then funded, shall be nonforfeitable and fully vested under federal Internal Revenue Code requirements.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-83

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 8/HB 202; Ga. L. 2014, p. 223, § 2/HB 843.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 11, 2009.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, rewrote this Code section.

47-1-84.
Modifications by board of trustees.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title to the contrary, the board of trustees of a retirement or pension system may modify a request by a plan member to make a contribution to the public retirement or pension system if the amount of the contribution would exceed the limits provided under Section 415 of the federal Internal Revenue Code by using the following methods:

If the law requires a lump sum payment for the purchase of service credit, the board of trustees may establish a periodic payment plan for the plan member to avoid a contribution in excess of the limits under Section 415(c) or 415(n) of the federal Internal Revenue Code; and

If the payment plan pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection will not avoid a contribution in excess of the limits, the board of trustees may refuse the plan member’s contribution.

For any plan member who first became a plan member in the public retirement or pension system before January 1, 1998, the limitation of Section 415(c)(1) of the federal Internal Revenue Code shall not be applied to reduce the amount of permissive service credit which may be purchased to an amount less than the amount which was allowed to be purchased under state law on August 5, 1997.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-84

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 8/HB 202.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 11, 2009.

47-1-85.
Assets of public retirement or pension system to be held in trust.

The assets of a public retirement or pension system shall be held in trust, and it shall not be possible at the time prior to satisfaction of all liabilities to plan members and their beneficiaries under the public retirement or pension system for any part of said assets to be used for, or diverted to, purposes other than for the exclusive benefit of plan members and their designated beneficiaries and for paying reasonable expenses of the public retirement or pension system and trust fund.

The board of trustees of a public retirement or pension system shall not engage in a transaction prohibited by Section 503(b) of the federal Internal Revenue Code.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-85

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 8/HB 202.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 11, 2009.

47-1-86.
Adopted plan document or rules and regulations govern.

Any other provision of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, to the extent that the Board of Trustees of the Georgia Municipal Employees Benefit System created by Chapter 5 of this title has adopted a plan document or rules and regulations that are in compliance with Sections 401(a) and 414(d) and other applicable sections of the federal Internal Revenue Code, such plan document or rules and regulations shall govern such system notwithstanding any conflicting provision in this chapter; provided, however, that the provisions of Code Section 47-1-13 shall in any event apply to said system.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-86

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 8/HB 202.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 11, 2009.